Illinois, session 104th, SB2173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/9.5)7    Sec. 9.5. Public Access Counselor; opinions.8    (a) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 9record is denied by a public body, except the General Assembly 10and committees, commissions, and agencies thereof, may file a 11request for review with the Public Access Counselor 12established in the Office of the Attorney General not later 13than 60 days after the date of the final denial. The request 14for review must be in writing, signed by the requester, and 15include (i) a copy of the request for access to records and 16(ii) any responses from the public body.17    (b) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 18record is made for a commercial purpose as defined in 19subsection (c-10) of Section 2 of this Act may not file a 20request for review with the Public Access Counselor. A person 21whose request to inspect or copy a public record was treated by 22the public body as a request for a commercial purpose under 23Section 3.1 of this Act may file a request for review with the   SB2173- 2 -LRB104 08954 BDA 19009 b1Public Access Counselor for the limited purpose of reviewing 2whether the public body properly determined that the request 3was made for a commercial purpose. 4    (b-5) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 5record was treated by a public body, except the General 6Assembly and committees, commissions, and agencies thereof, as 7a voluminous request under Section 3.6 of this Act may file a 8request for review with the Public Access Counselor for the 9purpose of reviewing whether the public body properly 10determined that the request was a voluminous request. 11    (c) Upon receipt of a request for review, the Public 12Access Counselor shall determine whether further action is 13warranted. If the Public Access Counselor determines that the 14alleged violation is unfounded, he or she shall so advise the 15requester and the public body and no further action shall be 16undertaken. In all other cases, the Public Access Counselor 17shall forward a copy of the request for review to the public 18body within 7 business days after receipt and shall specify 19the records or other documents that the public body shall 20furnish to facilitate the review. Within 7 business days after 21receipt of the request for review, the public body shall 22provide copies of records requested and shall otherwise fully 23cooperate with the Public Access Counselor. If a public body 24fails to furnish specified records pursuant to this Section, 25or if otherwise necessary, the Attorney General may issue a 26subpoena to any person or public body having knowledge of or   SB2173- 3 -LRB104 08954 BDA 19009 b1records pertaining to a request for review of a denial of 2access to records under the Act. Records or documents obtained 3by the Public Access Counselor from a public body for the 4purpose of addressing a request for review under this Section 5may not be disclosed to the public, including the requester, 6by the Public Access Counselor. These records, while in the 7possession of the Public Access Counselor, are exempt under 8this Act from disclosure by the Public Access Counselor.9    (d) Within 7 business days after it receives a copy of a 10request for review and request for production of records from 11the Public Access Counselor, the public body may, but is not 12required to, answer the allegations of the request for review. 13The answer may take the form of a letter, brief, or memorandum. 14The Public Access Counselor shall forward a copy of the answer 15to the person submitting the request for review, with any 16alleged confidential information to which the request pertains 17redacted from the copy. The requester may, but is not required 18to, respond in writing to the answer within 7 business days and 19shall provide a copy of the response to the public body.20    (e) In addition to the request for review, and the answer 21and the response thereto, if any, a requester or a public body 22may furnish affidavits or records concerning any matter 23germane to the review.24    (f) Unless the Public Access Counselor extends the time by 25no more than 30 business days by sending written notice to the 26requester and the public body that includes a statement of the   SB2173- 4 -LRB104 08954 BDA 19009 b1reasons for the extension in the notice, or decides to address 2the matter without the issuance of a binding opinion, the 3Attorney General shall examine the issues and the records, 4shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law, and shall 5issue to the requester and the public body an opinion in 6response to the request for review within 60 days after its 7receipt. The opinion shall be binding upon both the requester 8and the public body, subject to administrative review under 9Section 11.5.10    In responding to any request under this Section 9.5, the 11Attorney General may exercise his or her discretion and choose 12to resolve a request for review by mediation or by a means 13other than the issuance of a binding opinion. The decision not 14to issue a binding opinion shall not be reviewable.15    Upon receipt of a binding opinion concluding that a 16violation of this Act has occurred, the public body shall 17either take necessary action immediately to comply with the 18directive of the opinion or shall initiate administrative 19review under Section 11.5. If the opinion concludes that no 20violation of the Act has occurred, the requester may initiate 21administrative review under Section 11.5.22    A public body and any officer or employee of a public body 23that discloses records in accordance with an opinion of the 24Attorney General is immune from all liabilities by reason 25thereof and shall not be liable for penalties under this Act. 26    (g) If the requester files suit under Section 11 with   SB2173- 5 -LRB104 08954 BDA 19009 b1respect to the same denial that is the subject of a pending 2request for review, the requester shall notify the Public 3Access Counselor, and the Public Access Counselor shall take 4no further action with respect to the request for review and 5shall so notify the public body.6    (h) The Attorney General may also issue advisory opinions 7to public bodies regarding compliance with this Act. A review 8may be initiated upon receipt of a written request from the 9head of the public body or its attorney, which shall contain 10sufficient accurate facts from which a determination can be 11made. The Public Access Counselor may request additional 12information from the public body in order to assist in the 13review. A public body that relies in good faith on an advisory 14opinion of the Attorney General in responding to a request is 15not liable for penalties under this Act, so long as the facts 16upon which the opinion is based have been fully and fairly 17disclosed to the Public Access Counselor. 18(Source: P.A. 103-69, eff. 1-1-24.)